Maine, session 132, LD521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§6-B is enacted to read:
6-B. Military status. "Military status" means the status of an individual as a member
of the United States Armed Forces, as defined in 10 United States Code, Section 101(a)(4),
or of the state military forces, as described in Title 37-B, section 102.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§9-H is enacted to read:
9-H. Source of income. "Source of income" includes:
A. A housing voucher under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, Public
Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, as amended, and any form of federal, state or local housing
assistance provided to an individual or family or provided to an owner of housing on
behalf of an individual or family, including rental vouchers, rental assistance, rental
subsidies from nongovernmental organizations and homeownership subsidies;
B. Income received, including income received by an individual through a
representative payee, as a monthly benefit under 42 United States Code, Chapter 7,
Subchapter II, as amended; as a supplementary security income benefit under 42
United States Code, Chapter 7, Subchapter XVI, as amended; or as a benefit under the
federal Railroad Retirement Act of 1974, as amended;
C. Any other form of federal, state or local public assistance, including medical
assistance;
D. Income received by court order, including spousal support and child support;
E. Any payment from a trust, guardian, conservator, cosigner or relative; and
F. Any other lawful source of income or funds, including income from savings accounts
and investments.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Veteran status. "Veteran status" means the status of an individual as a former
member of the United States Armed Forces, as defined in 10 United States Code, Section
101(a)(4), or of the state military forces, as described in Title 37-B, section 102.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §4581, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §7 and c. 476, §2,
is further amended to read:
The opportunity for an individual to secure housing in accordance with the individual's
ability to pay, and without discrimination because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or, familial
status, military status, source of income or veteran status or because the individual has
sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007, is hereby
recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §4581-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §§8 to 10 and c. 476,
§3, is further amended to read:
§4581-A. Unlawful housing discrimination
It is unlawful housing discrimination, in violation of this Act:
Page 1 - 132LR0837(01)

1. Sale or rental of housing and other prohibited practices. For any owner, lessee,
sublessee, managing agent or other person having the right to sell or rent or manage a
housing accommodation, or any agent of these, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran
status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title
19‑A, section 4007 of any prospective purchaser, occupant or tenant of the housing
accommodation;
B. Refuse to show or refuse to sell, rent, lease, let or otherwise deny to or withhold
from any person the housing accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national
origin or, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran status or because
the person sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
C. Make, print or publish or cause to be made, printed or published any notice,
statement or advertisement relating to the sale, rental or lease of the housing
accommodation that indicates any preference, limitation or discrimination based upon
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, military status, source of income or
veteran status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, section 4007 or an intention to make any such preference, limitation
or discrimination;
D. Discriminate against any person because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or,
familial status, military status, source of income or veteran status or because the person
sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007 in the price,
terms, conditions or privileges of the sale, rental or lease of any housing
accommodations or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection with any
housing accommodations; or
E. Evict or attempt to evict any tenant of any housing accommodation because of the
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin or, familial status, military status, source of income
or veteran status of the tenant or because the tenant sought and received an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
2. Selling, brokering or appraising of housing. For any real estate broker or real
estate salesperson, or any agent of these, to:
A. Fail or refuse to show any person a housing accommodation listed for sale, lease or
rent because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or, familial status, military status,
source of income or veteran status or because the person sought and received an order
of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
B. Misrepresent, for the purpose of discriminating because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national
origin, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran status or any
Page 2 - 132LR0837(01)

415 previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section
426 4007, the availability or asking price of a housing accommodation listed for sale, lease
437 or rent or for such reason to fail to communicate to the person having the right to sell,
448 rent or lease the housing accommodation any offer for the same made by any applicant;
C. In any other manner other than those specified in paragraphs A and B to
discriminate against any applicant for a housing accommodation because of race or
color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin or, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran
status or because the applicant sought and received an order of protection under Title
19‑A, section 4007;
D. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record concerning the race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, military status, source of income or
veteran status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, section 4007 of any applicant for or intended occupant of a housing
accommodation; or
E. Accept for listing any housing accommodation when the person having the right to
sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation has directly or indirectly indicated an
intention of discriminating among prospective tenants or purchasers on the ground of
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, military status, source of income or
veteran status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, section 4007, or when the broker or salesperson knows or has reason
to know that the person having the right to sell, rent or lease the housing
accommodation has made a practice of discrimination since July 1, 1972; or
3. Making of loans; other financial assistance. For any person to whom application
is made for a loan or other form of financial assistance for the acquisition, construction,
rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation, whether secured or
unsecured, or agent of the person, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any oral or written inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran
status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title
19‑A, section 4007 of any applicant for financial assistance or of existing or
prospective occupants or tenants of housing accommodations; or
B. Discriminate in the granting of financial assistance, or in the terms, conditions or
privileges relating to obtaining or the use of any financial assistance, against any
applicant because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status, military status,
source of income or veteran status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an
order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007; or.
4. Receipt of public assistance. For any person furnishing rental premises or public
accommodations to refuse to rent or impose different terms of tenancy to any individual
who is a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance, including medical assistance
and housing subsidies, primarily because of the individual's status as recipient.
Page 3 - 132LR0837(01)

Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §4583, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §11, is further amended to
read:
§4583. Application
Nothing in this This Act may not be construed to prohibit or limit the exercise of the
privilege of every person and the agent of any person having the right to sell, rent, lease or
manage a housing accommodation to set up and enforce specifications in the selling,
renting, leasing or letting or in the furnishings of facilities or services in connection with
the facilities that are consistent with business necessity and are not based on the race, color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, country of
ancestral origin or, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran status of or
the receipt of public assistance payments by any prospective or actual purchaser, lessee,
tenant or occupant. Nothing in this This Act may not be construed to prohibit or limit the
exercise of the privilege of every person and the agent of any person making loans for or
offering financial assistance in the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or
maintenance of housing accommodations to set standards and preferences, terms,
conditions, limitations or specifications for the granting of loans or financial assistance that
are consistent with business necessity and are not based on the race, color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, country of ancestral
origin or, familial status, military status, source of income or veteran status of or the receipt
of public assistance payments by the applicant for a loan or financial assistance or of any
existing or prospective owner, lessee, tenant or occupant of a housing accommodation. This
Act may not be construed to prohibit any person from providing or otherwise making
available any services or other assistance to individuals receiving federal, state or local
housing assistance.